src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-I-sináákiatsis_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - sinaakia'tsisi - ok : # -m inanimate noun, book AEW NA1
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Sg: sinaakia'tsisi
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Pl: sinaakia'tsiistsi
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Non: sinaakia'tsii

     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: [ nisinaakia'tsisi, nisinaakia'tsiimi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: [ nisinaakia'tsiistsi, nisinaakia'tsiimistsi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Non: [ nisinaakia'tsii, nisinaakia'tsiimi ]

     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: [ nisinaakia'tsinnaani, nisinaakia'tsiiminnaani ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: [ nisinaakia'tsinnaanistsi, nisinaakia'tsiiminnaanistsi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Non: [ nisinaakia'tsinnaani, nisinaakia'tsiiminnaani ]

     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: [ kisinaakia'tsinnooni, kisinaakia'tsiiminnooni ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: [ kisinaakia'tsinnoonistsi, kisinaakia'tsiiminnoonistsi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Non: [ kisinaakia'tsinnooni, kisinaakia'tsiiminnooni ]

     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: [ kisinaakia'tsisi, kisinaakia'tsiimi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: [ kisinaakia'tsiistsi, kisinaakia'tsiimistsi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Non: [ kisinaakia'tsii, kisinaakia'tsiimi ]

     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: [ kisinaakia'tsoaawayi, kisinaakia'tsiimoaawayi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: [ kisinaakia'tsoaawaistsi, kisinaakia'tsiimoaawaistsi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Non: [ kisinaakia'tsoaawai, kisinaakia'tsiimoaawai ]

     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: [ osinaakia'tsisi, osinaakia'tsiimi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: [ osinaakia'tsiistsi, osinaakia'tsiimistsi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Non: [ osinaakia'tsii, osinaakia'tsiimi ]

     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: [ osinaakia'tsoaawayi, osinaakia'tsiimoaawayi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: [ osinaakia'tsoaawaistsi, osinaakia'tsiimoaawaistsi ]
     sinaakia'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Non: [ osinaakia'tsoaawai, osinaakia'tsiimoaawai ]
